Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 1. Citations, Construction and General Procedure

Cross references. —

As to the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, see chapter 21 of title 40.

§ 2-1-101.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Wyoming Probate Code”.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

The original Wyoming Probate Code (ch. 70, Laws 1890-91) was derived from the laws of California. The law which Wyoming adopted was repealed by California in 1931 (Stats. 1931, p. 687), with the exception of § 1723, which was repealed in 1939 (Stats. 1939, p. 1874). However, since much of the former code was reenacted verbatim or in a modified form by California, references, where pertinent, have been retained throughout title 2 to the current provisions of the California Probate Code (Deering 1974). See also catchline “Weight of California decisions” in notes to §

2-1-102

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” refers to ch. 142, Laws 1979, as amended by ch. 54, Laws 1980, the provisions of which appear as §§

2-1-101

to

2-15-106

. See “Revision of title” note appearing at the beginning of title 2.

History and disposition of original Probate Code. —

The original Probate Code in Wyoming was enacted by ch. 70, Laws 1890-91, which was subdivided into 28 chapters. These chapters have since been redesignated as articles and are reflected as such in the historical citations to the statutes and in the notes. Much of the original code is still in effect, although there has also been a considerable amount of subsequent legislation enacted affecting it, particularly ch. 142, Laws 1979, as amended by ch. 54, Laws 1980, which enacts the present Wyoming Probate Code. Moreover, some statutes relating to probate matters which existed prior to the 1890-91 enactment of the original Probate Code are still in effect as well and have been included in the present Wyoming Probate Code.

The following table shows the disposition of those provisions of the original Probate Code, ch. 70, Laws 1890-91, divided into articles, as originally enacted, which are still in effect and continue to be a part of the present Wyoming Probate Code or other titles in the 1977 Wyoming Statutes:

Article 1, §§ 1 to 5 (jurisdiction), appears as §§

2-2-101

,

2-2-104

to

2-2-108

and

2-2-201

.

Article 2, §§ 1 to 16 (proof of wills — granting of letters), appears as §§

2-2-102

,

2-2-103

and

2-6-301

.

Article 3, §§ 1 to 12 (contest of wills), appears as §

2-6-306

.

Article 4, §§ 1 to 7 (proof of lost and nuncupative wills), appears as §

2-6-207

.

Article 5, §§ 1 to 8 (executors), appears as §

2-6-211

.

Article 6, §§ 1 to 3 (form of letters testamentary), appears as §§

2-4-214

and

2-6-210

.

Article 7, §§ 1 to 15 (letters of administration, to whom and the order of granting), appears as §§

2-3-132

to

2-3-135

and

2-4-201

to

2-4-210

.

Article 8, §§ 1 to 19 (oaths and bonds of executors and administrators), appears as §§

2-3-101

to

2-3-103

and

2-3-105

to

2-3-120

.

Article 9, §§ 1 to 7 (special administrators — their powers and duties), appears as §§

2-7-301

to

2-7-307

.

Article 10, §§ 1 to 13 (wills found after letters granted and miscellaneous provisions), appears as §§

2-2-110

and

2-3-121

to

2-3-131

.

Article 11, §§ 1 to 9 (inventory and collection of the effects), appears as §§

2-7-401

and

2-7-403

to

2-7-409

.

Article 12, §§ 1 to 4 (embezzlement and surrender of property of the estate), appears as §§

2-7-411

to

2-7-413

.

Article 13, §§ 1 to 13 (providing for the support of the family and care of the homestead), appears as §§

2-7-501

to

2-7-503

,

2-7-506

,

2-7-507

and

2-7-509

.

Article 14, §§ 1 to 21 (of claims against the estate), appears as §§

2-7-703

,

2-7-704

,

2-7-710

to

2-7-714

,

2-7-717

and

2-7-718

.

Article 15, §§ 1 to 58 (sales in general), appears as §§

2-7-601

to

2-7-608

.

Article 16, §§ 1 to 11 (of the powers and duties of executors and administrators and of the management of the estate), appears as §§

2-7-103

to

2-7-108

.

Article 17, §§ 1 to 27 (liabilities and compensation of executors and administrators), none of the sections still appear.

Article 18, §§ 1 to 27 (final settlement and partial distribution prior thereto), appears as §§

2-8-101

,

2-15-101

,

2-15-102

and

2-15-104

to 20-15-106.

Article 19, §§ 1 to 5 (of wills probated in foreign countries), none of the sections still appear.

Article 20, §§ 1 to 16 (of orders, decrees, process, minutes, records, trials and appeals), appears as §§

2-2-301

to

2-2-312

.

Article 21, §§ 1 to 13 (of guardian and ward), appears as §§

3-2-101

to

3-2-112

and

14-2-201

.

Article 22, §§ 1 to 14 (guardians of insane and incompetent persons), appeared as §

25-1-101

prior to being repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 25, § 4.

Article 23, §§ 1 to 9 (the powers and duties of guardians), appears as §§

3-2-201

and

3-2-202

.

Article 24, §§ 1 to 16 (the sale of property and disposition of proceeds), appeared as §§

3-4-101

, 3-4-102, 3-4-104 to 3-4-115, 3-4-117 and 3-4-118 before the revision of title 3 by Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

Article 25, §§ 1 to 7 (nonresident guardians and wards), appeared as §§

3-5-101

to 3-5-107 before the revision of title 3 by Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

Article 26, §§ 1 to 9 (general and miscellaneous provisions), appeared as §§

3-1-101

, 3-2-113 to 3-2-119 and 3-4-103 before the revision of title 3 by Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

Article 27, §§ 1 to 4 (fees), appears as §§

2-2-403

and

2-2-404

.

Article 28, §§ 1 and 2 (miscellaneous matters), appears as §§

2-2-109

and

2-2-203

.

Section 3, art. 28, ch. 70, Laws 1890-91, provided that all pending probate proceedings should be completed under the existing law.

Section 4, art. 28, ch. 70, Laws 1890-91, provided that whenever the probate judge or court was mentioned, the same should mean and refer to the district court or judge.

Section 5, art. 28, ch. 70, Laws 1890-91, provided that until court commissioners were created, the duties prescribed for them were to be performed by the clerks of the district courts.

Section 6, art. 28, ch. 70, Laws 1890-91, repealed R.S. 1887, §§ 1187, 1969 to 2220, 2240 to 2273 and 2287 to 2331, and ch. 10, Laws 1890.

Section 7, art. 28, ch. 70, Laws 1890-91, made the act effective on January 10, 1891.

For the disposition, including earlier repeals, of all the provisions of ch. 70, Laws 1890-91, see the Table of Disposition of Acts, and also the Table of Revised and Renumbered Sections for new W.S. 1977 numbers and recent deletions, which appear in Volume 11.

Requirement of affidavit. —

Nothing in the Wyoming Probate Code, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

2-1-101

et seq., or Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

2-7-703

, 704 in particular, required a claimant to state the particular legal theories upon which the claim was based or to specify the evidence upon which the claim rested; district court erred in rejecting the company's claim due solely to its failure to file an attached affidavit, which was not required because the claim itself provided enough information to sufficiently challenge the attention of the personal representative and enable him to act advisedly in the exercise of his discretion.
Estate of
Frost v. Dodson, 2007 WY 63, 155 P.3d 1031,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Apr. 13, 2007).

Quoted

in

In re Estate of Croft, 713 P.2d 782,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 478

(Wyo. 1986).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Uniform Probate Code Procedures: Time for Wyoming to Reconsider,” see 2 Wyo. L. Rev. 293 (2002).

§ 2-1-102.
Rules of construction and applicability.

This code shall be liberally construed and applied, to promote the following purposes and policies to:

Simplify and clarify the law concerning the affairs of decedents, missing persons, protected persons, minors and incapacitated persons;

Discover and make effective the intent of a decedent in distribution of his property;

Promote a speedy and efficient system for liquidating the estate of the decedent and making distribution to his successors;

Facilitate use and enforcement of certain trusts.

Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this code, the principles of law and equity supplement the code provisions.

This code is a general act intended as a unified coverage of its subject matter and no part of it shall be deemed impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if it can reasonably be avoided.

The procedure herein prescribed shall govern all proceedings in probate brought after the effective date of this code. It shall also govern further procedure in proceedings in probate then pending unless the court determines its application in particular proceedings or parts thereof is not feasible or will work an injustice, in which event the former procedure shall apply.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this code.” —

The term “this code” seems to mean the Wyoming Probate Code. See §

2-1-101

and notes thereto.

Editor's notes. —

The first two cases under the heading “Weight of California decisions” below were decided prior to the enactment of §

2-1-102

relating to the rules of construction and applicability of the new Wyoming Probate Code, but are seemingly still applicable. See editor's note and also catchline “History and disposition of original Probate Code” in §

2-1-101

.

Applicability of equitable adoption. —

Foster children
provision must be interpreted in light of the stated overall goals
of simplicity, clarity, speed, and efficiency, and the doctrine of
equitable adoption is anything but simple, clear, or speedy in application;
Wyoming does not recognize the doctrine of equitable adoption. Therefore,
a claimant was unable to recover from a decedent, who was not her
biological father; the decedent could have adopted the claimant or
provided for her in his will, but did neither. In re Estate of Ronald, 2014 WY 129, 336 P.3d 129,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2014).

New Wyoming Probate Code applies to wills previously written

if the date of death follows the effective date of the Probate Code, unless then-existent vested rights are adversely affected. Therefore, the contract balance remaining for ranch land sold under a 1980 installment sales contract was to be distributed in accord with a 1969 will provision under which the testatrix gave, devised and bequeathed “all of my interest and title” in the land. Douglas v. Newell, 719 P.2d 971,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 555

(Wyo. 1986).

Weight of California decisions. —

The sections comprising the Probate Code were taken from California, so that the supreme court is inclined to follow decisions in that state on that subject, if it is not inappropriate to do so. Merrill v. District Court of Fifth Judicial Dist., 73 Wyo. 58, 272 P.2d 597,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1954).

Wyoming's probate law is derived from that of California, and the decisions of the courts of that state are given particular importance, at least when construing the probate statutes. In re Estate of Kimball, 583 P.2d 1274,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 232

(Wyo. 1978).

Because of adjustments to the probate codes of both Wyoming and California, Wyoming courts will no longer treat California precedent as having additional persuasive authority, but will afford it the same persuasive weight as that of any other sister jurisdiction. In re Estate of Zelikovitz, 923 P.2d 740,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1996).

Will unambiguous. —

In a challenge to a will, the court held that the language of the will was apparent and unambiguously reflected the testatrix's intent that the stock held solely in her name, located in the safety deposit box, be distributed to the sister, and did not reflect an intention that the stocks were to pass under the residuary clause. Baker v. Enis (In re Estate of Stanton), 2005 WY 74, 114 P.3d 1246,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2005).

Attorney who undertakes to probate decedent's will

is the attorney for both the estate and the personal representative, where the personal representative engages the attorney to assist her in performing her duties. Grievance Comm., Wyo. State Bar v. Riner, 765 P.2d 925,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1988).

Applicability of equitable adoption. —

Based on the clear and unambiguous language of the last will and testament, there was no indication that it was the decedent's intention to have decedent's stepchild's children inherit the share the stepchild would have inherited had the stepchild survived the decedent, where the decedent never officially adopted the stepchild, and the Wyoming Supreme Court declined to apply the doctrine of equitable adoption to affect the distribution of a testate estate and to avoid the operation of the anti-lapse statute, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

2-6-106

.Sanderson v. Bathrick (In re Estate of Seader), 2003 WY 119, 76 P.3d 1236,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2003).

Applied

in

In re Estate of Croft, 713 P.2d 782,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 478

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

In re Estate of Scott, 642 P.2d 1287,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 319

(Wyo. 1982); Lon V. Smith Found. v. Devon Energy Corp., 2017 WY 121, 403 P.3d 997,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

§ 2-1-103.
Objections to appointments.

For appointments made pursuant to the Wyoming Probate Code, unless a shorter period of time is specified in the code or by the court, or where an appointment will be made with no hearing or no notice, all persons having an objection to the appointment of any person as a personal representative, administrator, executor, trustee, conservator, fiduciary or receiver shall file the objection in the court considering the appointment no less than five (5) days prior to any hearing scheduled to consider the appointment. A court may waive this requirement upon a showing of good cause.

History.

2013 ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 169, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.